Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.240

Membership in system.

(1) All teachers employed full time in the public schools shall be members of the system except alien teachers who have been granted a temporary permit to teach as exchange teachers.

(2) A minimum of ninety days or the equivalent of ninety days of employment during a fiscal year shall be required to establish membership. A teacher shall be considered as employed full time if serving regularly for four-fifths or more of a school day or if assigned to duties which are the equivalent of four-fifths or more of a full time assignment. A teacher who is employed for less than full time service may become a member by filing an application with the retirement system, submitting satisfactory proof of teaching service and making the necessary payment before June 30 of the school year immediately following the one during which the service was rendered.

(3) After June 30th of the school year immediately following the one during which the less than full-time service was rendered, the necessary payment may be made under RCW 41.50.165(2).

[ 1994 c 197 s 14; 1991 c 35 s 38; 1979 ex.s. c 45 s 3; 1965 ex.s. c 81 s 3; 1963 ex.s. c 14 s 4; 1961 c 132 s 1; 1955 c 274 s 7; 1947 c 80 s 24; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-43. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 3, part; 1939 c 86 s 2, part; 1937 c 221 s 4, part; 1931 c 115 s 3, part; 1923 c 187 s 10, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-4, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 45: See note following RCW 41.26.040.

Severability—Effective date—1965 ex.s. c 81: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Savings—Severability—Effective date—1963 ex.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Effective date—1961 c 132: "The provisions of this act shall be effective July 1, 1961." [ 1961 c 132 s 8.]

Eligibility for retirement allowance: RCW 41.32.470.